Washington statutes.
RCW 15.70.030

Deposit and use of funds.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of law, funds and the proceeds of the trust assets which are not authorized to be administered by the secretary of agriculture of the United States under the provisions of RCW 15.70.020 shall be received by the director of agriculture and by him or her deposited with the treasurer of the state. Such funds are hereby appropriated and may be expended or obligated by the director of agriculture for the purposes of RCW 15.70.020 or for use by the director of agriculture for such of the rural rehabilitation purposes permissible under the charter of the now dissolved Washington rural rehabilitation corporation as may from time to time be agreed upon by the director of agriculture and the secretary of agriculture of the United States, subject to the applicable provisions of said public law 499.

[ 2010 c 8 s 6098; 1961 c 11 s 15.70.030. Prior: 1951 c 169 s 3.]